test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_cielgi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čielgi: # ok CIELGI
    čielgi+N+Sg+Nom:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Gen:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Acc:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Ill:   čiälgán
    čielgi+N+Sg+Loc:   čielgist
    čielgi+N+Sg+Com:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Sg+Abe:   čieˊlgittáá
    čielgi+N+Ess:      čielgin
    čielgi+N+Par:      čielgid
    čielgi+N+Pl+Nom:   čielgih
    čielgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [čielgij, čieˊlgij]
    čielgi+N+Pl+Acc:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Ill:   čielˊgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Loc:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Pl+Com:   čieˊlgijguin
    čielgi+N+Pl+Abe:   čieˊlgiittáá
